Maine, session 132, LD759.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1834 is enacted to read:
§1834. Side rails for beds in long-term care facilities
A long-term care facility shall equip a resident's bed with side rails if the resident or
the resident's legal guardian requests side rails or if side rails are necessary for the safety
of the resident. For purposes of this section, "long-term care facility" has the same meaning
as in section 2421-A, subsection 25.